California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(d) The commission may, consistent with other provisions of law, withhold from the public information generated or obtained pursuant to this section that it deems would
 pose a security threat to the public if disclosed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 10.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

365.

The actions of the commission pursuant to this chapter shall be consistent with the findings and declarations contained in Section 330. In addition, the commission shall do all of the following:

(a) Facilitate the efforts of the state’s electrical corporations to develop and obtain authorization from the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission for the creation and operation of an Independent System Operator and an independent Power Exchange, for the determination of which transmission and distribution facilities are subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the commission, and for approval, to the extent necessary, of the cost recovery mechanism established as provided in Sections 367 to 376, inclusive. The commission shall also participate fully in all proceedings before the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission in connection with the Independent System Operator and the independent Power Exchange, and shall encourage the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission to adopt protocols and procedures that strengthen the reliability of the interconnected transmission grid, encourage all publicly owned utilities in California to become full participants, and maximize enforceability of such protocols and procedures by all market participants.

(b) (1) Authorize direct transactions between electricity suppliers and end use customers, subject to implementation of the nonbypassable charge referred to in Sections 367 to 376, inclusive. Direct transactions shall commence simultaneously with the start of an Independent System Operator and Power Exchange referred to in subdivision (a). The simultaneous commencement shall occur as soon as practicable, but no later than January 1, 1998. The commission shall develop a phase-in schedule at the conclusion of which all customers shall have the right to engage in direct transactions. Any phase-in of customer eligibility for direct transactions ordered by the commission shall be equitable to all customer classes and accomplished as soon as practicable, consistent with operational and other technological considerations, and shall be completed for all customers by January 1, 2002.

(2) Customers shall be eligible for direct access irrespective of any direct access phase-in implemented pursuant to this section if at least one-half of that customer’s electrical load is supplied by energy from a renewable resource provider certified pursuant to Section 383, provided however that nothing in this section shall provide for direct access for electric consumers served by municipal utilities unless so authorized by the governing board of that municipal utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 10.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

365.1.

(a) Except as expressly authorized by this section, and subject to the limitations in subdivisions (b) and (c), the right of retail end-use customers pursuant to this chapter to acquire service from other providers is suspended until the Legislature, by statute, lifts the suspension or otherwise authorizes direct transactions. For purposes of this section, “other provider” means any person, corporation, or other entity that is authorized to provide electric service within the service territory of an electrical corporation pursuant to this chapter, and includes an aggregator, broker, or marketer, as defined in Section 331, and an electric service provider, as defined in Section 218.3. “Other provider” does not include a community choice aggregator, as defined in Section 331.1, and the limitations in this section do not apply to
 the sale of electricity by “other providers” to a community choice aggregator for resale to community choice aggregation electricity consumers pursuant to Section 366.2.

(b) The commission shall authorize individual retail nonresidential end-use customers to acquire electric service from other providers in each electrical corporation’s distribution service territory, up to a maximum allowable total kilowatthours annual limit. The maximum allowable annual limit shall be established by the commission for each electrical corporation at the maximum total kilowatthours supplied by all other providers to distribution customers of that electrical corporation during any sequential 12-month period between April 1, 1998, and October 11, 2009. Within six months of October 11, 2009, the commission shall adopt and implement a reopening schedule that commences immediately and will phase in the allowable amount of increased kilowatthours over a period of not
 less than three years, and not more than five years, raising the allowable limit of kilowatthours supplied by other providers in each electrical corporation’s distribution service territory from the number of kilowatthours provided by other providers as of October 11, 2009, to the maximum allowable annual limit for that electrical corporation’s distribution service territory. The commission shall review and, if appropriate, modify its currently effective rules governing direct transactions, but that review shall not delay the start of the phase-in schedule.

(c) Once the commission has authorized additional direct transactions pursuant to subdivision (b), it shall do both of the following:

(1) Ensure that other providers are subject to the same requirements that apply to the state’s three largest electrical corporations under any programs or rules adopted by the commission to
 implement the resource adequacy provisions of Section 380, the renewables portfolio standard provisions of Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11), the requirements for the electricity sector adopted by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code), and the requirements of the integrated resource planning process as specified in Sections 454.52 to 454.54, inclusive. This requirement applies notwithstanding any prior decision of the commission to the contrary.

(2) (A) Ensure that, in the event that the commission authorizes, in the situation of a contract with a third party, or orders, in the situation of utility-owned generation, an electrical corporation to obtain generation resources that the commission determines are needed to meet system or local area reliability needs for the benefit of all
 customers in the electrical corporation’s distribution service territory, the net capacity costs of those generation resources are allocated on a fully nonbypassable basis consistent with departing load provisions as determined by the commission, to all of the following:

(i) Bundled service customers of the electrical corporation.

(ii) Customers that purchase electricity through a direct transaction with other providers.

(iii) Customers of community choice aggregators.

(B) If the commission authorizes or orders an electrical corporation to obtain generation resources pursuant to subparagraph (A), the commission shall ensure that those resources meet a system or local reliability need in a manner that benefits all customers of the electrical corporation.
 The commission shall allocate the costs of those generation resources to ratepayers in a manner that is fair and equitable to all customers, whether they receive electric service from the electrical corporation, a community choice aggregator, or an electric service provider.

(C) The resource adequacy benefits of generation resources acquired by an electrical corporation pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be allocated to all customers who pay their net capacity costs. Net capacity costs shall be determined by subtracting the energy and ancillary services value of the resource from the total costs paid by the electrical corporation pursuant to a contract with a third party or the annual revenue requirement for the resource if the electrical corporation directly owns the resource. An energy auction shall not be required as a condition for applying this allocation, but may be allowed as a means to establish the energy and ancillary services value
 of the resource for purposes of determining the net costs of capacity to be recovered from customers pursuant to this paragraph, and the allocation of the net capacity costs of contracts with third parties shall be allowed for the terms of those contracts.

(D) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this paragraph, to provide additional guidance to the commission with respect to the implementation of subdivision (g) of Section 380, and to ensure that the customers to whom the net costs and benefits of capacity are allocated are not required to pay for the cost of electricity they do not consume.

(d) (1) If the commission approves a centralized resource adequacy mechanism pursuant to subdivisions (h) and (i) of Section 380, upon the implementation of the centralized resource adequacy mechanism the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall
 be suspended. If the commission later orders that electrical corporations cease procuring capacity through a centralized resource adequacy mechanism, the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall again apply.

(2) If the use of a centralized resource adequacy mechanism is authorized by the commission and has been implemented as set forth in paragraph (1), the net capacity costs of generation resources that the commission determines are required to meet urgent system or urgent local grid reliability needs, and that the commission authorizes to be procured outside of the Section 380 or Section 454.5 processes, shall be recovered according to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(3) This subdivision does not supplant the resource adequacy requirements of Section 380 or the resource procurement procedures established in Section 454.5.

(e) On or before June 1, 2019, the commission shall issue an order regarding direct transactions that provides as follows:

(1) Increase the maximum allowable total kilowatthours annual limit by 4,000 gigawatthours and apportion that increase among the service territories of the electrical corporations.

(2) All residential and nonresidential customer accounts that are on direct access as of January 1, 2019, remain authorized to participate in direct transactions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 5.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

365.2.

The commission shall ensure that bundled retail customers of an electrical corporation do not experience any cost increases as a result of retail customers of an electrical corporation electing to receive service from other providers. The commission shall also ensure that departing load does not experience any cost increases as a result of an allocation of costs that were not incurred on behalf of the departing load.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 547, Sec. 14.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

365.3.

(a) The commission shall post, in a consolidated location on its internet website, each load-serving entity’s residential electric rate tariffs and programs to enable customers and local governments to compare rates, services, environmental attributes, and other offerings. The documents posted shall include, but not be limited to, joint comparison rates for each community choice aggregator and electrical corporation and the disclosures required of retail sellers pursuant to Sections 398.4 and 398.5. This information shall be available and easily accessible on the load-serving entities’ internet websites.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a), each load-serving entity shall make available to the commission all information about its residential electric rate tariffs and
 programs.

(c) Dissemination of publicly available and factual information pursuant to subdivision (a) by a load-serving entity to a customer shall not constitute a violation of Section 707.

(d) For purposes of this section, “load-serving entity” has the same meaning as in Section 380.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 246.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

365.5.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the commission from exercising its authority to investigate a process for certification and regulation of the rates, charges, terms, and conditions of default service. If the commission determines that a process for certification and regulation of default service is in the public interest, the commission shall submit its findings and recommendations to the Legislature for approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 275, Sec. 4.   Effective August 15, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

366.

(a) The commission shall take actions as needed to facilitate direct transactions between electricity suppliers and end-use customers. Customers shall be entitled to aggregate their electrical loads on a voluntary basis, provided that each customer does so by a positive written declaration. If no positive declaration is made by a customer, that customer shall continue to be served by the existing electrical corporation or its successor in interest, except aggregation by community choice aggregators, accomplished pursuant to Section 366.2.

(b) Aggregation of customer electrical load shall be authorized by the commission for all customer classes, including, but not limited, to small commercial or residential customers. Aggregation may be accomplished by private market aggregators, special districts, or on any other basis made available by market opportunities and agreeable by positive written declaration by individual consumers, except aggregation by community choice aggregators, which shall be accomplished pursuant to Section 366.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 838, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

366.1.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources with respect to its power program described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 80100) of Division 27 of the Water Code.

(2) “Existing project participant” means a city with rights and obligations to the Magnolia Power Project under the Magnolia Power Project Planning Agreement, dated May 1, 2001.

(3) “Magnolia Power Project” means a proposed natural gas-fired electric generating facility to be located at an existing site in Burbank and for which an application for certification has been filed with the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Act (Docket No. 00-SIT-1) and deemed data adequate pursuant to the expedited six-month licensing process established under Section 25550 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 80110 of the Water Code or Commission Decision 01-09-060, if the Magnolia Power Project has been constructed and is otherwise capable of beginning deliveries of electricity to the existing project participants, an existing project participant may serve as a community aggregator on behalf of all retail end-use customers within its jurisdiction.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not become operative until both of the following occur:

(1) The commission implements a cost-recovery mechanism, consistent with subdivision (d), that is applicable to customers that elected to purchase electricity from an alternate provider between February 1, 2001, and the effective date of the act adding this section.

(2) The commission submits a report certifying its satisfaction of paragraph (1) to the Senate Energy, Utilities and Communications Committee, or its successor, and the Assembly Committee on Utilities and Commerce, or its successor.

(d) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that each retail end-use customer that has purchased power from an electrical corporation on or after February 1, 2001, should bear a fair share of the department’s power purchase costs, as well as power purchase contract obligations incurred as of January 1, 2003, that are recoverable from electrical corporation customers in commission-approved rates. It is the further intent of the Legislature to prevent any shifting of recoverable costs between customers.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that the provisions in this subdivision are consistent with the requirements of Section 360.5 and Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code, and are therefore declaratory of existing law.

(e) A retail end-use customer purchasing power from a community aggregator pursuant to subdivision (b) shall reimburse the department for all of the following:

(1) A charge equivalent to the charge which would otherwise be imposed on the customer by the commission to recover bond related costs pursuant to an agreement between the commission and the Department of Water Resources pursuant to Section 80110 of the Water Code, that charge shall be payable until all obligations of the Department of Water Resources pursuant to Division 27 of the Water Code are fully paid or otherwise discharged.

(2) The costs of the department, equal to the share of the department’s estimated net unavoidable power purchase contract costs attributable to the customer, as determined by the commission, for the period commencing with the customer’s purchases of electricity from a community aggregator, through the expiration of all then existing power purchase contracts entered into by the department.

(f) A retail end-use customer purchasing power from a community aggregator pursuant to subdivision (b) shall reimburse the electrical corporation that previously served the customer for all of the following:

(1) The electrical corporation’s unrecovered past undercollections, including all financing costs attributable to that customer, that the commission lawfully determines may be recovered in rates.

(2) The costs of the electrical corporation recoverable in commission-approved rates, equal to the share of the electrical corporation’s estimated net unavoidable power purchase contract costs attributable to the customer, as determined by the commission, for the period commencing with the customer’s purchases of electricity from the community aggregator, through the expiration of all then existing power purchase contracts entered into by the electrical corporation.

(g) (1) A charge or cost imposed pursuant to subdivision (e), and all revenues received to pay the charge or cost, shall be the property of the Department of Water Resources. A charge or cost imposed pursuant to subdivision (f), and all revenues received to pay the charge or cost, shall be the property of the particular electrical corporation. The commission shall establish mechanisms, including agreements with, or orders with respect to, electrical corporations necessary to assure that the revenues received to pay a charge or cost payable pursuant to this section are promptly remitted to the party entitled to those revenues.

(2) A charge or cost imposed pursuant to this section shall be nonbypassable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 837, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

366.2.

(a) (1) Customers shall be entitled to aggregate their electrical loads as members of their local community with community choice aggregators.

(2) Customers may aggregate their loads through a public process with community choice aggregators, if each customer is given an opportunity to opt out of the customer’s community’s aggregation program.

(3) If a customer opts out of a community choice aggregator’s program, or has no community choice aggregation program available, that customer shall have the right to continue to be served by the existing electrical corporation or its successor in interest.

(4) The
 implementation of a community choice aggregation program shall not result in a shifting of costs between the customers of the community choice aggregator and the bundled service customers of an electrical corporation.

(5) A community choice aggregator shall be solely responsible for all generation procurement activities on behalf of the community choice aggregator’s customers, except where other generation procurement arrangements are expressly authorized by statute.

(b) If a public agency seeks to serve as a community choice aggregator, it shall offer the opportunity to purchase electricity to all residential customers within its jurisdiction.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Section 366, a community choice aggregator is hereby authorized to aggregate the electrical load of interested electricity
 consumers within its boundaries to reduce transaction costs to consumers, provide consumer protections, and leverage the negotiation of contracts. However, the community choice aggregator shall not aggregate electrical load if that load is served by a local publicly owned electric utility. A community choice aggregator may group retail electricity customers to solicit bids, broker, and contract for electricity and energy services for those customers. The community choice aggregator may enter into agreements for services to facilitate the sale and purchase of electricity and other related services. Those service agreements may be entered into by an entity authorized to be a community choice aggregator, as defined in Section 331.1.

(2) Under community choice aggregation, customer participation shall not require a positive written declaration, but each customer shall be informed of the customer’s right to opt out of the community choice
 aggregation program. If no negative declaration is made by a customer, that customer shall be served through the community choice aggregation program. If an existing customer moves the location of the customer’s electrical service within the jurisdiction of the community choice aggregator, the customer shall retain the same subscriber status as before the move, unless the customer affirmatively changes the customer’s subscriber status. If the customer is moving from outside to inside the jurisdiction of the community choice aggregator, customer participation shall not require a positive written declaration, but the customer shall be informed of the customer’s right to elect not to receive service through the community choice aggregator.

(3) A community choice aggregator establishing electrical load aggregation pursuant to this section shall develop an implementation plan detailing the process and consequences of aggregation. The implementation
 plan, and any subsequent changes to it, shall be considered and adopted at a duly noticed public hearing. The implementation plan shall contain all of the following:

(A) An organizational structure of the program, its operations, and its funding.

(B) Ratesetting and other costs to participants.

(C) Provisions for disclosure and due process in setting rates and allocating costs among participants.

(D) The methods for entering and terminating agreements with other entities.

(E) The rights and responsibilities of program participants, including, but not limited to, consumer protection procedures, credit issues, and shutoff procedures.

(F) Termination of the program.

(G) A description of the third parties that will be supplying electricity under the program, including, but not limited to, information about financial, technical, and operational capabilities.

(H) The methods for ensuring procurement from small, local, and diverse business enterprises in all categories, including, but not limited to, renewable energy, energy storage system, and smart grid projects.

(4) A community choice aggregator establishing electrical load aggregation shall prepare a statement of intent with the implementation plan. Any community choice load aggregation established pursuant to this section shall provide for all of the following:

(A) Universal access.

(B) Reliability.

(C) Equitable treatment of all classes of customers.

(D) Any requirements established by state law or by the commission concerning aggregated service, including those rules adopted by the commission pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8341 for the application of the greenhouse gases emission performance standard to community choice aggregators.

(5) In order to determine the cost-recovery mechanism to be imposed on the community choice aggregator pursuant to subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) that shall be paid by the customers of the community choice aggregator to prevent shifting of costs, the community choice aggregator shall file the implementation plan with the commission, and any other information requested by the
 commission that the commission determines is necessary to develop the cost-recovery mechanism in subdivisions (d), (e), and (f).

(6) The commission shall notify any electrical corporation serving the customers proposed for aggregation that an implementation plan initiating community choice aggregation has been filed, within 10 days of the filing.

(7) Within 90 days after the community choice aggregator establishing load aggregation files its implementation plan, the commission shall certify that it has received the implementation plan, including any additional information necessary to determine a cost-recovery mechanism. After certification of receipt of the implementation plan and any additional information requested, the commission shall then provide the community choice aggregator with its findings regarding any cost recovery that must be paid by customers of the community
 choice aggregator to prevent a shifting of costs as provided for in subdivisions (d), (e), and (f).

(8) An entity proposing community choice aggregation shall not furnish electricity to electricity consumers within its boundaries until the commission determines the cost recovery that must be paid by the customers of that proposed community choice aggregation program, as provided for in subdivisions (d), (e), and (f). The commission shall designate the earliest possible effective date for implementation of a community choice aggregation program, taking into consideration the impact on any annual procurement plan of the electrical corporation that has been approved by the commission.

(9) All electrical corporations shall cooperate fully with any community choice aggregators that investigate, pursue, or implement community choice aggregation programs. Cooperation shall include
 providing the entities with appropriate billing and electrical load data, including, but not limited to, electrical consumption data as defined in Section 8380 and other data detailing electricity needs and patterns of usage, as determined by the commission, and in accordance with procedures established by the commission. The commission shall exercise its authority pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 2100) to enforce the requirements of this paragraph when it finds that the requirements of this paragraph have been violated. Electrical corporations shall continue to provide all metering, billing, collection, and customer service to retail customers that participate in community choice aggregation programs. Bills sent by the electrical corporation to retail customers shall identify the community choice aggregator as providing the electrical energy component of the bill. The commission shall determine the terms and conditions under which the electrical corporation provides services to community
 choice aggregators and retail customers.

(10) If the commission finds that an electrical corporation has violated this section, the commission shall consider the impact of the violation on community choice aggregators.

(11) The commission shall proactively expedite the complaint process for disputes regarding an electrical corporation’s violation of its obligations pursuant to this section in order to provide for timely resolution of complaints made by community choice aggregation programs, so that all complaints are resolved in no more than 180 days following the filing of a complaint by a community choice aggregation program concerning the actions of the incumbent electrical corporation. This deadline may only be extended under either of the following circumstances:

(A) Upon agreement of all of the parties to the
 complaint.

(B) The commission makes a written determination that the deadline cannot be met, including findings for the reason for this determination, and issues an order extending the deadline. A single order pursuant to this subparagraph shall not extend the deadline for more than 60 days.

(12) (A) An entity authorized to be a community choice aggregator, as defined in Section 331.1, that elects to implement a community choice aggregation program within its jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter, shall do so by ordinance. A city, county, or city and county may request, by affirmative resolution of its governing council or board, that another entity authorized to be a community choice aggregator act as the community choice aggregator on its behalf. If a city, county, or city and county, by resolution, requests another authorized entity be the community choice
 aggregator for the city, county, or city and county, that authorized entity shall be responsible for adopting the ordinance to implement the community choice aggregation program on behalf of the city, county, or city and county.

(B) Two or more entities authorized to be a community choice aggregator, as defined in Section 331.1, may participate as a group in a community choice aggregation program pursuant to this chapter, through a joint powers agency established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, if each entity adopts an ordinance pursuant to subparagraph (A). Pursuant to Section 6508.1 of the Government Code, members of a joint powers agency that is a community choice aggregator may specify in the joint powers agreement that, unless otherwise agreed by the members of the agency, the debts, liabilities, and obligations of the agency shall not be the debts, liabilities, and
 obligations, either jointly or severally, of the members of the agency. The commission shall not, as a condition of registration or otherwise, require an agency’s members to voluntarily assume the debts, liabilities, and obligations of the agency to the electrical corporation unless the commission finds that the agreement by the agency’s members is the only reasonable means by which the agency may establish its creditworthiness under the electrical corporation’s tariff to pay charges to the electrical corporation under the tariff.

(13) Following adoption of aggregation through the ordinance described in paragraph (12), the program shall allow any retail customer to opt out and to continue to be served as a bundled service customer by the existing electrical corporation, or its successor in interest. Delivery services shall be provided at the same rates, terms, and conditions, as approved by the commission, for community choice aggregation
 customers and customers that have entered into a direct transaction where applicable, as determined by the commission. Once enrolled in the aggregated entity, any ratepayer that chooses to opt out within 60 days or two billing cycles of the date of enrollment may do so without penalty and shall be entitled to receive default service pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a). Customers that return to the electrical corporation for procurement services shall be subject to the same terms and conditions as are applicable to other returning direct access customers from the same class, as determined by the commission, as authorized by the commission pursuant to this code or any other law, except that those customers shall be subject to no more than a 12-month stay requirement with the electrical corporation. Any reentry fees to be imposed after the opt-out period specified in this paragraph, shall be approved by the commission and shall reflect the cost of reentry. The commission shall exclude any amounts
 previously determined and paid pursuant to subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) from the cost of reentry.

(14) This section does not authorize any city or any community choice retail load aggregator to restrict the ability of retail electricity customers to obtain or receive service from any authorized electric service provider in a manner consistent with law.

(15) (A) The community choice aggregator shall fully inform participating customers at least twice within two calendar months, or 60 days, in advance of the date of commencing automatic enrollment. Notifications may occur concurrently with billing cycles. Following enrollment, the aggregated entity shall fully inform participating customers for not less than two consecutive billing cycles. Notification may include, but is not limited to, direct mailings to customers, or inserts in water, sewer, or other
 utility bills. Any notification shall inform customers of both of the following:

(i) That the customer is to be automatically enrolled and that the customer has the right to opt out of the community choice aggregator without penalty.

(ii) The terms and conditions of the services offered.

(B) The community choice aggregator may request the commission to approve and order the electrical corporation to provide the notification required in subparagraph (A). If the commission orders the electrical corporation to send one or more of the notifications required pursuant to subparagraph (A) in the electrical corporation’s normally scheduled monthly billing process, the electrical corporation shall be entitled to recover from the community choice aggregator all reasonable incremental costs it incurs related to the notification
 or notifications. The electrical corporation shall fully cooperate with the community choice aggregator in determining the feasibility and costs associated with using the electrical corporation’s normally scheduled monthly billing process to provide one or more of the notifications required pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(C) Each notification shall also include a mechanism by which a ratepayer may opt out of community choice aggregated service. The opt out may take the form of a self-addressed return postcard indicating the customer’s election to remain with, or return to, electrical service provided by the electrical corporation, or another straightforward means by which the customer may elect to derive electrical service through the electrical corporation providing service in the area.

(16) A community choice aggregator shall have an operating service agreement with the
 electrical corporation before furnishing electric service to consumers within its jurisdiction. The service agreement shall include performance standards that govern the business and operational relationship between the community choice aggregator and the electrical corporation. The commission shall ensure that any service agreement between the community choice aggregator and the electrical corporation includes equitable responsibilities and remedies for all parties. The parties may negotiate specific terms of the service agreement, provided that the service agreement is consistent with this chapter.

(17) The community choice aggregator shall register with the commission, which may require additional information to ensure compliance with basic consumer protection rules and other procedural matters.

(18) Once the community choice aggregator’s contract is signed, the community
 choice aggregator shall notify the applicable electrical corporation that community choice service will commence within 30 days.

(19) Once notified of a community choice aggregator program, the electrical corporation shall transfer all applicable accounts to the new supplier within a 30-day period from the date of the close of the electrical corporation’s normally scheduled monthly metering and billing process.

(20) An electrical corporation shall recover from the community choice aggregator any costs reasonably attributable to the community choice aggregator, as determined by the commission, of implementing this section, including, but not limited to, all business and information system changes, except for transaction-based costs as described in this paragraph. Any costs not reasonably attributable to a community choice aggregator shall be recovered from ratepayers, as determined
 by the commission. All reasonable transaction-based costs of notices, billing, metering, collections, and customer communications or other services provided to an aggregator or its customers shall be recovered from the aggregator or its customers on terms and at rates to be approved by the commission.

(21) At the request and expense of any community choice aggregator, electrical corporations shall install, maintain, and calibrate metering devices at mutually agreeable locations within or adjacent to the community choice aggregator’s political boundaries. The electrical corporation shall read the metering devices and provide the data collected to the community choice aggregator at the aggregator’s expense. To the extent that the community choice aggregator requests a metering location that would require alteration or modification of a circuit, the electrical corporation shall only be required to alter or modify a circuit if such alteration or
 modification does not compromise the safety, reliability, or operational flexibility of the electrical corporation’s facilities. All costs incurred to modify circuits pursuant to this paragraph shall be borne by the community choice aggregator.

(d) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that each retail end-use customer that has purchased electricity from an electrical corporation on or after February 1, 2001, should bear a fair share of the Department of Water Resources’ electricity purchase costs, and electricity purchase contract obligations incurred as of the effective date of the act adding this section, that are recoverable from electrical corporation customers in commission-approved rates. It is further the intent of the Legislature to prevent any shifting of recoverable costs between customers.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that this
 subdivision is consistent with the requirements of Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code and Section 360.5 of this code, and is therefore declaratory of existing law.

(e) A retail end-use customer that purchases electricity from a community choice aggregator pursuant to this section shall pay both of the following:

(1) A charge equivalent to the charges that would otherwise be imposed on the customer by the commission to recover bond-related costs pursuant to any agreement between the commission and the Department of Water Resources pursuant to Section 80110 of the Water Code, which charge shall be payable until any obligations of the Department of Water Resources pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code are fully paid or otherwise discharged.

(2) Any